Maine, session 132, LD885.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §6552, sub-§2, ¶D is enacted to read:
D. The prohibition on the possession and discharge of a firearm does not apply to a
person 21 years of age or older who is not a student at that school and who possesses a
permit to carry a concealed handgun under Title 25, chapter 252.